Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 46.17.350 and 2019 c 44 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Before accepting an application for a vehicle registration, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to pay the following vehicle license fee by vehicle type:VEHICLE TYPEINITIAL FEERENEWAL FEEDISTRIBUTED UNDER(a) Auto stage, six seats or less$ 30.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.030(b) Camper$ 4.90$ 3.50RCW 46.68.030(c) Commercial trailer$ 34.00$ 34.00RCW 46.68.035(d) For hire vehicle, six seats or less$ 30.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.030(e) Mobile home (if registered)$ 30.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.030(f) Moped$ 30.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.030(g) Motor home$ 30.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.030(h) Motorcycle$ 30.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.030(i) Off-road vehicle$ 18.00$ 18.00RCW 46.68.045(j) Passenger car$ 30.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.030(k) Private use single-axle trailer$ 15.00$ 15.00RCW 46.68.035(l) Snowmobile$ ((50.00))75.00$ ((50.00))75.00RCW 46.68.350(m) Snowmobile, vintage$ ((12.00))18.00$ ((12.00))18.00RCW 46.68.350(n) Sport utility vehicle$ 30.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.030(o) Tow truck$ 30.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.030(p) Trailer, over 2000 pounds$ 30.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.030(q) Travel trailer$ 30.00$ 30.00RCW 46.68.030(r) Wheeled all-terrain vehicle, on-road use$ 12.00$ 12.00RCW 46.09.540(s) Wheeled all-terrain vehicle, off-road use$ 18.00$ 18.00RCW 46.09.510(2) The vehicle license fee required in subsection (1) of this section is in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005, and any other fee or tax required by law.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act applies to registrations that are due or become due on or after September 30, 2026.--- END ---